South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3335.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Designation of representation in magistrates court SECTION 1.    Section 33-1-103 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 33-1-103.    A corporation or partnership, as defined in this section, or a housing authority may designate an employee or principal of the corporation, partnership, or housing authority to represent it in magistrates court. This designation must be in writing and must be submitted to the magistrate at the time the initial pleading in the case is filed by the party. Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 5 of Title 40 or any other provision of law, the person so designated, while representing the corporation, partnership, or housing authority in magistrates court, is not engaging in the unauthorized practice of law. As used in this section, a corporation or partnership is defined as a general partnership, a limited liability partnership, a limited liability company, a limited partnership, a professional association, a professional corporation, a nonprofit corporation, a business corporation, or a statutory close corporation. Housing authority representative SECTION 2.    Chapter 3, Title 31 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 31-3-70.    A housing authority may designate an employee or a manager to represent the housing authority in magistrates court as provided in Section 33-1-103. Time effective SECTION 3.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 15th day of May, 2026. Approved the 19th day of May, 2026. __________